Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB86.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-NDEVELOPMENT, RELIEF AND EDUCATIONFOR ALIEN MINORSSection 2001-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617181920 "PHEAA." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college under Article XIX-A.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(3) A State-related institution as defined in section 1502-A.Section 2002-N. Eligibility.An individual other than a nonimmigrant within the meaning of 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15)(F), (H)(iii), (J), including only students or trainees, or (M) (relating to definitions), who meets the requirements under section 2003-N, shall be exempt from paying out-of-State tuition rates at a public institution of higher education.Section 2003-N. Requirements.(a) Requirements of eligibility.--(1) The individual must have attended a public, nonpublic, charter or cyber charter secondary school in this Commonwealth for at least two years.(2) The individual must have graduated from a public, nonpublic, charter or cyber charter secondary school in this Commonwealth or received the equivalent of a high school diploma in this Commonwealth.(b) Guidance.--The department shall issue guidance to public institutions of higher education on what evidence is acceptable to prove the requirements under this section.Section 2004-N. Institution of higher education requirements.An institution of higher education that admits an individual 20250SB0086PN0041 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this article shall:(1) Keep a record of the number of individuals admitted under this article and annually report this information to the department.(2) Adopt appropriate policies to implement the provisions of this article.Section 2005-N. Financial aid.(a) Residency.--An individual accepted by an institution of higher education under this article shall qualify as a resident of this Commonwealth for purposes of educational financial aid through PHEAA.(b) Alternative application.--PHEAA shall create an alternative financial aid application for an individual under this section. The application shall not require an applicant's Social Security number or a parent of the applicant's Social Security number.Section 2006-N. Departmental requirements.The department shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives an annual report consisting of a compilation of the reports submitted to the department under section 2004-N.Section 2007-N. Confidentiality.Information obtained in the implementation of this article is confidential and shall be used or disclosed only for purposes of administering this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0086PN0041 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728